Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 17. Vermont Coordinate System

§ 671.
Vermont Coordinate Systems defined.

The systems of plane coordinates which have been established by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey (formerly the U. S. Coast and Geodetic Survey) or its successors for defining and stating the horizontal positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the State of Vermont are hereafter to be known and designated as the “Vermont Coordinate System 1927 and the Vermont Coordinate System 1983.” The term “Vermont Coordinate System” is synonymous with the term “Vermont State Plane Coordinate System.”

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 3, 1988;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 38.

§ 672.
Coordinates defined.

The plane coordinate values for a point on the earth’s surface, used to express the horizontal position or location of such point on the Vermont Coordinate Systems, shall consist of two distances, expressed in U.S. Survey feet and decimals of a foot when using the Vermont Coordinate System 1927 and expressed in meters and decimals of a meter, or U.S. Survey feet and decimals of a foot when using the Vermont Coordinate System 1983. One of these distances, to be known as the “x-coordinate,” shall give the position in an east-and-west direction; the other, to be known as the “y-coordinate,” shall give the position in a north-and-south direction. These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to plane rectangular coordinate values for the monumented points of the National Spatial Reference System established by the U. S. Coast and Geodetic Survey, its predecessor, or its successors.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 3, 1988;

2007, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 39.

§ 673.
Additional definitions.

For purposes of more precisely defining the Vermont Coordinate System 1927, the following definition by the U. S. Coast and Geodetic Survey (now the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey) is adopted:

The Vermont Coordinate System 1927 is a transverse Mercator projection of the Clarke spheroid of 1866, having a central meridian 72 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set one part in 28,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 72 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 42 degrees 30 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 feet and y = 0 feet.

For purposes of defining the Vermont Coordinate System 1983, the following definition by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey is adopted. The Vermont Coordinate System 1983 is a transverse Mercator projection of the GRS 80 ellipsoid, having a central meridian 72 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich, on which meridian the scale is set one part in 28,000 too small. The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of the meridian 72 degrees 30 minutes west of Greenwich and the parallel 42 degrees 30 minutes north latitude. This origin is given the coordinates: x = 500,000 meters and y = 0 meters.

The position of the Vermont Coordinate System 1983 shall be marked on the ground by existing or future survey stations established in conformity with standards adopted by the National Geodetic Survey or its successors for first-order or second-order work, or both, whose geodetic positions have been rigidly adjusted to the North American Datum 1983 (NAD 1983).

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 3, 1988;

1993, No. 6

, § 1.

§ 674.
Record.

Coordinates based on either Vermont Coordinate System, purporting to define the position of a point on a land boundary, presented to be recorded in any public land records or deed records shall be accompanied by a specific statement as to their basis and a description of the survey method used to determine them on the record plat or description of the survey.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 3, 1988;

1993, No. 6

, § 2.

§ 675.
Restriction.

The use of the terms “Vermont Coordinate System 1927” or “Vermont Coordinate System 1983” on any map, report of survey, or other document shall be limited to coordinates based on the Vermont Coordinate Systems as defined in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 3, 1988.

§ 676.
Description.

For the purposes of describing the location of any survey station or land boundary corner in the State of Vermont, it shall be considered a complete, legal, and satisfactory description of such location to give the position of such survey station or land boundary corner on the system of plane coordinates as defined in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 3, 1988.

§ 677.
Construction.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall require any purchaser or mortgagee of real property to rely solely on a description, any part of which depends entirely upon the Vermont Coordinate Systems.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 3, 1988.

§ 678.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter shall be declared invalid, such invalidity shall not affect any other portion of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision; and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared severable.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 3, 1988.

§ 679.
Transition.

The Vermont Coordinate System 1927 shall not be used for projects commenced after January 1, 2000; the Vermont Coordinate System 1983 will be the sole system for projects commenced after this date.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. May 3, 1988.